Hawaii statutes.
[§707-785] Restitution for victims
of labor trafficking. (1) In addition to any other penalty, and
notwithstanding a victim's failure to request restitution under section
706-646(2), the court shall order restitution to be paid to the victim,
consisting of an amount that is the greater of:

(a) The total gross income or value to the defendant
of the victim's labor or services; or

(b) The value of the victim's labor or services, as
guaranteed under the minimum wage provisions of chapter 387 or the Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, Public Law 75-718, title 29 United States Code sections
201 through 219, inclusive, whichever is greater.

(2) The return of the victim to the victim's
home country or other absence of the victim from the jurisdiction shall not
relieve the defendant of the defendant's restitution obligation. [L 2011, c
146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next